Illinois, session 104th, HB1329.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Counties Code is amended by adding Section 53-6043 as follows: 6    (55 ILCS 5/3-6043 new)7    Sec. 3-6043. Co-responder unit of the McHenry County 8Sheriff's Office. The McHenry County Sheriff's Office shall 9establish a co-responder unit as provided in Section 11-1.5-5 10of the Illinois Municipal Code. 11    Section 10. The Illinois Municipal Code is amended by 12changing Sections 11-1.5-5, 11-1.5-10, 11-1.5-15, and 1311-1.5-20 as follows: 14    (65 ILCS 5/11-1.5-5)15    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2029)16    Sec. 11-1.5-5. Definitions. As used in this Division:17    "Department" means the East St. Louis Police Department, 18the Peoria Police Department, the Springfield Police 19Department, or the Waukegan Police Department, or the McHenry 20County Sheriff's Office. 21    "Social Worker" means a licensed clinical social worker or   HB1329 Engrossed- 2 -LRB104 07015 RTM 17052 b1licensed social worker, as those terms are defined in the 2Clinical Social Work and Social Work Practice Act. 3    "Station adjustment" has the meaning given to that term in 4Section 1-3 of the Juvenile Court Act of 1987. 5    "Unit" means a co-responder unit created under this 6Division. 7(Source: P.A. 102-756, eff. 5-10-22; 103-154, eff. 6-30-23.) 8    (65 ILCS 5/11-1.5-10)9    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2029)10    Sec. 11-1.5-10. Establishment; responsibilities; focus.11    (a) Each department shall establish, subject to 12appropriation, a co-responder unit no later than 6 months 13after May 10, 2022 (the effective date of Public Act 102-756) 14this amendatory Act of the 102nd General Assembly, including 15the hiring of personnel as provided in this Division. The 16McHenry County Sheriff's Office shall establish a co-responder 17unit no later than 6 months after the effective date of this 18amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly and shall hire 19the personnel required under this Division. 20    (b) Along with the duties described in Sections 11-1.5-15 21and 11-1.5-20, the unit's social workers are responsible for 22following up with conducting follow-up visits for victims who 23may benefit from mental or behavioral health services. The 24unit shall utilize community resources, including services 25provided through the Department of Human Services and social   HB1329 Engrossed- 3 -LRB104 07015 RTM 17052 b1workers in juvenile and adult investigations, to connect 2individuals with appropriate services. 3    (c) The unit's primary area of focus shall be victim 4assistance. 5(Source: P.A. 102-756, eff. 5-10-22.) 6    (65 ILCS 5/11-1.5-15)7    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2029)8    Sec. 11-1.5-15. Duties. The duties of the unit include, 9but are not limited to:10        (1) Serving as a resource to a department's community 11    to identify and coordinate the social services available 12    to residents who are victims of criminal acts. 13        (2) Networking with area social service agencies to 14    develop a community-mutual resource system and wrap-around 15    services (a team-based, collaborative case management 16    approach) for victims in need of social service 17    assistance; and fostering relationships with community 18    organizations not limited to area hospitals, school 19    districts, juvenile justice system, and various community 20    groups. 21        (3) Employing social workers of the unit who shall: 22            (A) Upon request, provide community presentations 23        on an array of social service topics. 24            (B) Assist individuals in diversion from the 25        criminal justice system by addressing problems or   HB1329 Engrossed- 4 -LRB104 07015 RTM 17052 b1        concerns through therapeutic intervention. 2            (C) Facilitate follow-up treatment or referral to 3        the appropriate community resource organization. 4            (D) When requested, assist department employees in 5        securing services for those in need and provide 6        educational information to help the employee better 7        understand the circumstances or the community concern. 8            (E) Meet with walk-ins requesting information or 9        assistance. 10            (F) Protect the interest, confidentiality, and 11        civil rights of the client. 12            (G) Train social work interns who may be working 13        within the unit. 14            (H) Be on-call after regular business hours, as 15        needed. 16            (I) Inform clients, prior to providing services 17        under this Division, what communications are 18        confidential pursuant to applicable provisions of 19        State or federal law, rule, or regulation and what may 20        be shared with the social worker's employer. 21            (J) Consult on all cases as needed by the 22        department. 23            (K) Perform other functions as provided in Section 24        11-1.5-20 or otherwise needed by a department. 25        (4) Employing social workers who shall work with 26    victims of crimes as follows:   HB1329 Engrossed- 5 -LRB104 07015 RTM 17052 b1            (A) Review police reports to identify known 2        victims and contact them to offer direct and referred 3        services. 4            (B) Assist victims with filing police reports and 5        victim compensation forms. 6            (C) Provide safety planning services to victims. 7            (D) Provide crisis counseling services to victims 8        and their families. 9            (E) Conduct home visits with victims in 10        conjunction with law enforcement police backup, when 11        needed. 12            (F) Assist victims in obtaining orders of 13        protection. A social worker, in the performance of his 14        or her duties under this subparagraph, is an advocate, 15        as that term is defined in Section 112A-3 of the Code 16        of Criminal Procedure of 1963. 17            (G) Facilitate court advocacy services for 18        victims, including arranging for transportation to and 19        from court. 20            (H) Maintain confidential case files which include 21        social history, diagnosis, formulation of treatment, 22        and documentation of services. 23            (I) Perform miscellaneous personal advocacy tasks 24        for victims, as needed. 25            (J) Oversee activities to ensure those victims 26        with the most urgent needs are given the highest   HB1329 Engrossed- 6 -LRB104 07015 RTM 17052 b1        priority for services. 2            (K) Provide status updates on the progress of a 3        victim's case. 4        (5) Adhering to and understanding the applicable 5    policies, procedures, and orders of a department. 6        (6) Attaining department-established unit goals. 7        (7) Maintaining a positive relationship with 8    co-workers, as well as the investigators from area law 9    enforcement agencies, police departments and facilitating 10    the exchange of information and resources pertaining to 11    investigations that would not violate confidentiality as 12    protected pursuant to applicable provisions of State or 13    federal law, rule, or regulation. 14        (8) Keeping informed on crime trends within the 15    department the unit supports City. 16        (9) Remaining obedient and responsive to all lawful 17    verbal and written orders issued by superiors. 18        (10) Completing police reports and other required 19    documentation. 20        (11) Performing such other duties as may be required 21    by State law, city ordinance, and department policy or as 22    may be assigned by a sworn supervisor. 23(Source: P.A. 102-756, eff. 5-10-22.) 24    (65 ILCS 5/11-1.5-20)25    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2029)  HB1329 Engrossed- 7 -LRB104 07015 RTM 17052 b1    Sec. 11-1.5-20. Social workers.2    (a) Unit social workers may be referred to as victim 3service specialists. Social workers are responsible for 4working as a team to provide trauma-informed crisis 5intervention, case management, advocacy, and ongoing emotional 6support to the victims of all crimes, with extra attention to 7crimes that cause a high level of victim trauma.8    (b) Unit social workers involved in a case under adult 9investigations may perform the following responsibilities: 10        (1) Working with domestic violence investigators. 11        (2) Assisting victims with finding safe housing, 12    transportation, and legal assistance. 13        (3) Providing other needed resources for victims and 14    their families, including working with children who 15    witness or experience domestic violence. 16        (4) Assisting victims and their children in setting up 17    counseling. 18        (5) Helping reduce victims' chances of reentry into 19    violent situations. 20    (c) Unit social workers involved in a case under juvenile 21investigations may perform the following responsibilities: 22        (1) Working with families that have habitual runaways 23    and determining why the juveniles keep running away. 24        (2) Providing services to families where there have 25    been domestic disturbances between the juveniles and their 26    parents.   HB1329 Engrossed- 8 -LRB104 07015 RTM 17052 b1        (3) Providing resources for parents to help their 2    children who are struggling in school or need 3    transportation to school. 4        (4) Providing guidance and advice to the families of a 5    juvenile who has been arrested and what the next steps and 6    options are in the process. 7        (5) Assisting a juvenile with station adjustments and 8    creating a station adjustment program in a department. 9        (6) Providing services to juvenile victims and 10    families where the Department of Children and Family 11    Services either did not get involved or did not provide 12    services. 13        (7) Assisting with overcoming feuds between groups of 14    juveniles. 15        (8) Assisting in instances where the families are not 16    cooperative with law enforcement police. 17        (9) Discussing with families and juveniles options and 18    solutions to prevent future arrest. 19        (10) Maintaining a list of families in need that the 20    unit or department have had contact with for department or 21    city special events. 22        (11) Helping facilitate or assist a department in 23    community-oriented events, such as setting up an event 24    where officers or unit personnel read books with younger 25    children, talking about cyber crimes and social media, or 26    having an officer or unit personnel visit a school for   HB1329 Engrossed- 9 -LRB104 07015 RTM 17052 b1    other activities. 2        (12) Helping reduce juvenile recidivism. 3(Source: P.A. 102-756, eff. 5-10-22.)